Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 5 GENERAL PROVISIONS
23-5-119.5. Student fees - legislative declaration - definitions - institutional plans - fee information - reporting.

The general assembly hereby finds that, due to increasing financial restrictions, fees are increasingly being used as sources of revenue for state institutions of higher education. The general assembly further finds that it is important to allow the governing boards flexibility in managing student fees in the manner that is most effective for their respective institutions. However, the general assembly also finds that state institutions of higher education must develop meaningful processes for receiving and considering student input concerning the amount assessed in fees and the purposes for which the institution uses the revenues received. It is therefore the intent of the general assembly that the governing boards adopt policies concerning the definition, assessment, increase, and use of fees, including but not limited to the policies specified in this section, which governing board policies shall be in accordance with the policies adopted by the commission pursuant to section 23-1-105.5.

For purposes of this section:

"Auxiliary facility" has the same meaning as defined in section 23-5-101.5 (2)(a).

"Commission" means the Colorado commission on higher education established in section 23-1-102.

"State institution of higher education" or "institution" means a state-supported institution of higher education in Colorado.

Each governing board is authorized to require students to pay fees to offset costs that are specific to certain courses or programs or that otherwise exceed or are in addition to normal overhead and operating costs that are paid by tuition revenues. Revenues received by a governing board as student fees are not subject to annual appropriation. The costs for which a governing board may impose fees may include, but need not be limited to:

Costs related to the construction, maintenance, furnishing, and equipping of buildings and infrastructure;

Costs that are unique to specific courses or programs and benefit the students who choose to enroll in the course or program;

Costs related to student-centered facilities, services, or activities such as student centers, recreation facilities, technology, parking lots, child care, health clinics, mandatory insurance, student government, and other student organizations or activities;

Costs incurred by an institution that are in addition to the costs of direct delivery of instruction such as registration costs, costs for student orientation and graduation, and costs incurred in communicating with students and their families.

On or before July 1, 2012, each governing board shall adopt for each institution and campus that it governs an institutional plan for student fees. Each governing board shall ensure that the process for developing the plan includes the opportunity for meaningful input from the students enrolled at the affected institution or campus. At a minimum, the fee plan shall specify:

The types and purposes of student fees collected by the institution;

The procedures for establishing, reviewing, changing the amount of, and discontinuing student fees, including the level of student involvement in each process, which, at a minimum, shall include consultation with students whenever possible prior to the establishment of a new fee or the increase of an existing fee;

Procedures by which students may contest the imposition or amount of a fee and a process for resolving disputes regarding fees; and

A plan for addressing reserve fund balances.

A governing board shall annually review and revise, as necessary, the fee plan for each of the institutions and campuses that it governs. In creating, reviewing, and revising the fee plans, a governing board shall collaborate with the student government organization at the applicable institution or campus. Each governing board shall make the fee plans available to the public on a website for the respective institution or campus. In addition, each governing board shall annually provide to the department of higher education and the commission a copy of the fee plan for each institution or campus it governs.

The fee plan adopted for each institution pursuant to subsection (4) of this section shall include, but need not be limited to, the following policies:

Fees related to bonds issued on behalf of auxiliary facilities on or after July 1, 1997. (I) (A) For any bonds or other debt obligations issued or incurred on or after July 1, 1997, on behalf of an auxiliary facility, the issuing or incurring governing board may assess a user fee against persons using the auxiliary facility that includes the amount necessary for repayment of the bonds or other debt obligations and any amount necessary for the operation and maintenance of the auxiliary facility.

(B) If a governing board uses revenues from a general student fee for the repayment of bonds or other debt obligations issued or incurred pursuant to this paragraph (a), the governing board shall specify the portion of the general student fee that is actually applied to repayment of the bonds or other debt obligations. The itemization of any general student fee, all or a portion of which is used for repayment of bonds or other debt obligations, shall appear on the student billing statement.

(II) The issuing or incurring governing board may, subject to the restrictions specified in paragraph (c) of this subsection (5), pledge any excess revenue received from any user fee assessed pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a) or from any portion of a general student fee applied to the repayment of such bonds or other debt obligations pursuant to sub-subparagraph (B) of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a) to the repayment of any bonds or other debt obligations issued or incurred on behalf of any other auxiliary facility, so long as such pledge of excess revenue from any general student fee authorized for the repayment of bonds or other debt obligations issued or incurred to finance a specific facility shall terminate upon full repayment of all bonds or other debt obligations, including refunding bonds or obligations, and all fees and costs related to such bonds or other debt obligations incurred with respect to such specific facility.

(III) On and after the date upon which all bonds or other debt obligations issued, secured, or incurred pursuant to this paragraph (a) are fully repaid:

The amount of the user fee assessed against persons using the auxiliary facility, if any, shall be reduced, if necessary, so as not to exceed one hundred ten percent of the costs incurred in operating and maintaining the auxiliary facility during the preceding year; except that the governing board may reduce the amount of the user fee to an amount not to exceed one hundred twenty percent of the costs incurred in operating and maintaining the auxiliary facility during the preceding year and set aside the additional ten percent in a reserve fund for repair and replacement of the auxiliary facility;

The governing board shall cease collecting any portion of a general student fee assessed for the repayment of the bonds or other debt obligations; except that, if no user fee was assessed for the repayment of the bonds or other debt obligations or if the amount of the user fee is less than the costs incurred in operating and maintaining the auxiliary facility during the preceding year, the governing board may continue collecting the specified portion of the general student fee that was applied to repayment of the bonds or other debt obligations so long as said portion of the general student fee is reduced, if necessary, to an amount that, in combination with any user fee collected for the auxiliary facility, does not exceed one hundred ten percent of the costs incurred in operating and maintaining the auxiliary facility during the preceding year. Notwithstanding the provisions of this sub-subparagraph (B), the governing board may reduce said portion of the general student fee to an amount that, in combination with any user fee collected for the auxiliary facility, does not exceed one hundred twenty percent of the costs incurred in operating and maintaining the auxiliary facility during the preceding year and set aside the additional ten percent in a reserve fund for repair and replacement of the auxiliary facility.

The revenues received pursuant to this subparagraph (III), either through a user fee or through a specified portion of a general student fee, may not be pledged for the repayment of any bonds or other debt obligations issued on behalf of any other auxiliary facility. Any amount of said revenue that exceeds both the amount necessary for the operation and maintenance of the auxiliary facility and any amount set aside in a reserve fund for repair and replacement of the auxiliary facility is surplus and may be used by the governing board as provided in section 23-5-103 (3).

Fees related to bonds issued on behalf of auxiliary facilities prior to July 1, 1997. (I) For any bonds or other debt obligations issued or incurred prior to July 1, 1997, on behalf of an auxiliary facility:

(A) Approval of the student body is not required for any fee assessed for repayment of said bonds or other debt obligations;

(B) Approval of the student body is not required to increase any fee that is applied to the repayment of said bonds or other debt obligations if the fee increase is necessitated by a covenant in the authorizing bond resolution or other agreement for which the bonds or other debt obligations were issued or incurred;

(C) Approval of the student body is not required to increase any fee that is applied to the repayment of said bonds or other debt obligations if the fee increase is assessed for the repayment of bonds that are issued to refund the existing bonds.

(II) The issuing or incurring governing board may, subject to the restrictions specified in paragraph (c) of this subsection (5), pledge any excess revenue received from the fee, whether it is a user fee or a portion of a general student fee applied to the repayment of such bonds or other debt obligations, to the repayment of any bonds or other debt obligations issued or incurred on behalf of any other auxiliary facility, so long as such pledge of excess revenue from any general student fee authorized for the repayment of bonds or other debt obligation issued or incurred to finance a specific facility shall terminate upon full repayment of all bonds or other debt obligations, including refunding bonds or obligations, and all fees and costs related to such bonds or other debt obligations incurred with respect to such specific facility.

(III) On and after the date upon which all bonds or other debt obligations issued, secured, or incurred pursuant to this paragraph (b) are fully repaid:

(A) The amount of the user fee, if any, assessed against persons using the auxiliary facility shall be reduced, if necessary, so as not to exceed one hundred ten percent of the costs incurred in operating and maintaining the auxiliary facility during the preceding year; except that the governing board may reduce the amount of the user fee to an amount not to exceed one hundred twenty percent of the costs incurred in operating and maintaining the auxiliary facility during the preceding year and set aside the additional ten percent in a reserve fund for repair and replacement of the auxiliary facility;

(B) The governing board shall cease collecting any portion of a general student fee assessed for the repayment of the bonds or other debt obligations; except that, if no user fee was assessed for the repayment of the bonds or other debt obligations or if the amount of the user fee is less than the costs incurred in operating and maintaining the auxiliary facility during the preceding year, the governing board may continue collecting the specified portion of the general student fee that was applied to repayment of the bonds or other debt obligations so long as said portion of the general student fee is reduced, if necessary, to an amount that, in combination with any user fee collected for the auxiliary facility, does not exceed one hundred ten percent of the costs incurred in operating and maintaining the auxiliary facility during the preceding year. Notwithstanding the provisions of this sub-subparagraph (B), the governing board may reduce said portion of the general student fee to an amount that, in combination with any user fee collected for the auxiliary facility, does not exceed one hundred twenty percent of the costs incurred in operating and maintaining the auxiliary facility during the preceding year and set aside the additional ten percent in a reserve fund for repair and replacement of the auxiliary facility.

(C) The revenues received pursuant to this subparagraph (III), either through a user fee or through a specified portion of a general student fee, may not be pledged for the repayment of any bonds or other debt obligations issued on behalf of any other auxiliary facility. Any amount of said revenue that exceeds both the amount necessary for the operation and maintenance of the auxiliary facility and any amount set aside in a reserve fund for repair and replacement of the auxiliary facility is surplus and may be used by the governing board as provided in section 23-5-103 (3).

Restrictions on pledging of amounts received in fees. (I) Subject to the provisions of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (5), a user fee that is assessed against persons using an auxiliary facility that is not designated as an enterprise pursuant to section 23-5-101.5 may be pledged for the repayment of bonds or other debt obligations issued or incurred on behalf of any other auxiliary facility that is not designated as an enterprise, as provided in sections 23-5-102 and 23-5-103.

(II) Subject to the provisions of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (5), a user fee that is assessed against persons using an auxiliary facility that is designated as an enterprise by the university of Colorado pursuant to section 23-5-101.5 may be pledged for the repayment of bonds or other debt obligations issued or incurred on behalf of another auxiliary facility that is designated as an enterprise by the university of Colorado, as provided in sections 23-5-102 and 23-5-103.

(III) A governing board may not pledge a user fee assessed against persons using an auxiliary facility that is not designated as an enterprise for repayment of bonds or other debt obligations issued or incurred on behalf of any auxiliary facility that is designated as an enterprise or on behalf of the institution with which the auxiliary facility is associated. Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (c), a governing board may not pledge a user fee assessed against persons using an auxiliary facility that is designated as an enterprise pursuant to section 23-5-101.5 for the repayment of bonds or other debt obligations issued or incurred on behalf of any other auxiliary facility, regardless of whether the other auxiliary facility is designated as an enterprise, or on behalf of the institution with which the auxiliary facility is associated.

Itemization of bond fees. Every fee, the purpose of which includes making payments on bonds or other obligations, shall be separately itemized on the student billing statement.

As soon as practicable following August 10, 2011, each governing board shall make reasonable efforts to provide on the website for each institution or campus it governs current information about the tuition rates and fees, including information concerning the purposes of the fees, charged by the institution or campus; except that the institution or campus may provide information about fees that are specific to courses or programs either on its website or in the most recent course catalog, whichever is appropriate.

As soon as practicable following August 10, 2011, each governing board shall make reasonable efforts to provide a function for calculating tuition and fees on the website of each institution or campus it governs to assist students in estimating their annual and total cost of attendance at the institution or campus.

Beginning with the 2011-12 academic year, each governing board shall ensure that the tuition bill for each student enrolled in an institution or campus governed by the governing board includes a clear itemization of the fees charged to the student.

In establishing fees, a governing board shall comply with the procedures specified in the fee plan for the applicable institution or campus. In addition, the governing board shall provide to students at least thirty days' advance notice of a new fee assessment or fee increase, which notice, at a minimum, specifies:

The amount of the new fee or of the fee increase;

The reason for the new fee or fee increase;

The purpose for which the institution will use the revenues received from the new fee or fee increase; and

Whether the new fee or fee increase is temporary or permanent and, if temporary, the expected date on which the new fee or fee increase will be discontinued.

A decision by a governing board with regard to a fee shall be final and incontestable either on the thirtieth day after final action by the governing board or on the date on which any evidence of indebtedness or other obligation payable from the fee revenues is issued or incurred by the governing board, whichever is earlier.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire section added, (HB 11-1301), ch. 297, p. 1411, § 2, effective August 10.

23-5-120. Student fees - deposit - interest.

Student fees imposed by a governing board for a student association or student government at a state-supported institution of higher education and collected from students enrolled in such institution shall be deposited in a separate fund of the institution to be used for the purposes for which the fees were charged. All interest derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund.

Nothing in this section shall limit the authority of the governing board of any state-supported institution of higher education to pledge moneys in the fund described in subsection (1) of this section for any of the purposes permitted under section 23-5-103 if the student action authorizing such fees contemplated such pledge.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 1141, § 6, effective July 1.

23-5-121. Governing boards - authority to establish nonprofit corporations for developing discoveries and technology.

The general assembly recognizes that the transfer of newly created technologies from university research to the private sector and the resulting potential creation and expansion of Colorado companies are essential to the economic growth of this state, promote the public good, and should be encouraged. The general assembly further recognizes that a valid public purpose will be furthered and a commitment to the economic growth of this state demonstrated by empowering the governing boards of the state-supported institutions of higher education and the Colorado commission on higher education, referred to in this section as the "commission", to establish nonprofit corporations to effect such a transfer and development and by empowering the governing boards of the state-supported institutions of higher education to cooperate with the private sector.

The governing board of any state-supported institution of higher education or the commission may incorporate one or more private nonprofit corporations under articles 121 to 137 of title 7, C.R.S., for the purpose of developing discoveries and technology resulting from science and technology research at such state-supported institution of higher education. Such a corporation shall have all rights and powers of a private nonprofit corporation organized under the laws of this state and shall not be an agency of state government or a department or political subdivision thereof and shall not be subject to any provisions of law affecting only governmental or public entities; except that provisions as provided for in section 23-1-108 (1)(f) regarding affirmative action shall be followed.

The governing board of any state-supported institution of higher education or the commission may transfer to a corporation incorporated pursuant to subsection (2) of this section all rights to discoveries and technologies resulting from science and technology research at such state-supported institution of higher education. Such transfer may be made in consideration of the corporation's undertaking to develop the technology for the benefit of the state-supported institution of higher education and the state. Any such rights to discoveries and technologies that are transferred to the corporation by a governing board or by the commission shall not be further transferred by the corporation without adequate consideration being received therefor.

Prior to the transfer to a corporation incorporated pursuant to subsection (2) of this section of all rights to discoveries and technologies resulting from science and technology research at any state-supported institution of higher education, the governing board of such state-supported institution of higher education or the commission shall enter into an agreement with said corporation that shall include the terms of financial remuneration due the institution or the commission.

As a means of carrying out the purposes stated in this section, the governing board of any state-supported institution of higher education or the commission may, through one or more corporations incorporated pursuant to subsection (2) of this section:

Own and license rights to products, technology, and scientific information;

Own shares in corporations engaged in the development, manufacture, or marketing of products, technology, or scientific information under a license from the governing board or the commission or a corporation incorporated pursuant to subsection (2) of this section;

Participate as the general partner or as a limited partner, either directly or through a subsidiary corporation formed for that purpose, in limited partnerships, general partnerships, or joint ventures engaged in the development, manufacture, or marketing of products, technology, or scientific information under a license from the board or the commission or a corporation incorporated pursuant to subsection (2) of this section; except that the governing board shall be subject to the provisions of section 24-113-104, C.R.S., regarding competition with private enterprise by institutions of higher education;

Develop economic incentives for faculty members and other employees of the state-supported institution of higher education or the commission in order to encourage development of technology, which may include assignment of a share of the royalty payments, payment of supplemental compensation, or such other economic incentives as will in the judgment of the governing board or the commission best promote the purposes of this section;

In the case of a governing board of a state-supported institution of higher education, cooperate with the commission and the office of information technology created in the office of the governor in technology transfers pursuant to section 23-1-106.7;

In the case of the commission, accept donations, income or other revenues and make grants to support commission programs; and

Carry on such other activities as the governing board or the commission may deem appropriate for achieving the purposes of this section.

At the discretion of the governing board of the state-supported institution of higher education, research facilities and personnel at their own institutions or campuses may be utilized to achieve the purposes of this section.

The state of Colorado or state-supported institution or the commission shall not be held responsible for any debt or liability incurred by the corporation created pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire section added, p. 552, § 1, effective April 19.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 638, § 1, effective April 30.

L. 97:

(2) amended, p. 763, § 34, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 99:

(2) amended, p. 850, § 6, effective May 24; entire section amended, p. 882, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 412, § 3, effective April 13.

L. 2006:

(5)(e) amended, p. 1734, § 16, effective June 6.

23-5-122. Intrainstitutional and intrasystem transfers - course scheduling.

On or before October 1, 1993, the governing board of every state-supported institution of higher education shall have in place and enforce policies regarding transfers by students between undergraduate degree programs which are offered within the same institution or within the same institutional system. Such policies shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following provisions:

If, not more than ten years prior to transferring into an undergraduate degree program, a student earns credit hours which are required for graduation from such undergraduate degree program, such credit hours shall apply to the completion of such student's graduation requirements from such undergraduate degree program following such transfer;

A student who transfers into an undergraduate degree program shall not be required to complete a greater number of credit hours in those courses which are required for graduation from such undergraduate degree program than are required of students who began in such undergraduate degree program, nor shall there be any minimum number of credit hours required post-transfer other than the normal degree requirements for nontransferring students; and

The grade point average which is required for a student to apply for and be fully considered for transfer into an undergraduate degree program shall be no higher than that which is required for graduation from such undergraduate degree program.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 2126, § 8, effective June 11.

23-5-123. Sabbatical leave - legislative declaration - policy - production of records.

The general assembly hereby recognizes the necessity of maintaining a high caliber of faculty within the state system of higher education and the importance of the faculty's contribution in delivering quality education within the state system of higher education. The general assembly recognizes that faculty sabbaticals play an important role in developing and enhancing faculty expertise, thereby supporting faculty excellence in teaching and research. The general assembly also recognizes that a faculty sabbatical is a privilege, rather than a right, and should be granted only when it results in adding value to the institution, the students' education, and the state. The general assembly therefore declares that state-supported institutions of higher education should judiciously grant faculty sabbaticals that will improve excellence within the state system of higher education and will thereby benefit the state.

On or before October 1, 1994, the governing board of each state-supported institution of higher education shall have in place and shall enforce policies regarding faculty sabbaticals, including but not limited to the policies specified in this subsection (2).

Effective October 1, 1994, a governing board of an institution of higher education may not authorize a sabbatical or extended administrative paid leave for any person holding an administrative position at a state-supported institution of higher education; except that a governing board may, for a reasonable period of time, authorize administrative paid leave for disciplinary or investigatory purposes.

A governing board may not grant a sabbatical for any faculty member more often than once every seven years.

Prior to taking a sabbatical, a faculty member shall submit to the governing board of the institution that employs the faculty member a detailed sabbatical plan that:

Specifies how the sabbatical activity will result in the faculty member's professional growth, how it will enhance the institution's reputation and the students' educational experience at the institution, and how it will increase the overall level of knowledge in the faculty member's area of expertise;

Specifies the goals that the faculty member will achieve while on sabbatical.

A governing board may not grant a subsequent sabbatical to any faculty member who does not meet the goals stated in the faculty member's sabbatical plan.

The governing board of each institution shall approve any sabbaticals taken by faculty at the institution in advance. In approving a sabbatical, the governing board shall consider the quality of the faculty member's proposed activities while on sabbatical, the individuals who will be involved in such activities, and the benefits to be received from such activities by the faculty member, the institution, and the students at the institution.

Upon completion of a sabbatical, the faculty member shall submit a final sabbatical report to the governing board of the institution that employs the faculty member, including a summary of the faculty member's activities while on sabbatical and the benefits derived by the faculty member. Final sabbatical reports need not include specific details of the faculty member's research conducted while on sabbatical. Final sabbatical reports are open records pursuant to section 24-72-203, C.R.S., and may not be included in the faculty member's personnel file.

Each participant in the sabbatical process is responsible for ensuring that each sabbatical meets the requirements of this section and any other requirements that may be included in the appropriate governing board's sabbatical policy. Each governing board shall specify a mechanism to hold each participant in the sabbatical process accountable for meeting the sabbatical policy requirements.

Each governing board shall produce all sabbatical records for all approved sabbaticals and a list of all disapproved sabbaticals for inspection by the joint budget committee, the education committees of the senate and the house of representatives, and the Colorado commission on higher education upon request. In addition, each governing board shall distribute copies of the sabbatical policies developed by each governing board pursuant to this section, with amendments as necessary, to the education committees of the senate and the house of representatives and to the Colorado commission on higher education.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 830, § 1, effective April 28.

23-5-124. Student enrollment - prohibition - public peace and order convictions - definitions.

No person who is convicted of a riot offense shall be enrolled in a state-supported institution of higher education for a period of twelve months following the date of conviction.

A student who is enrolled in a state-supported institution of higher education and who is convicted of a riot offense shall be immediately suspended from the institution upon the institution's notification of such conviction for a period of twelve months following the date of conviction; except that if a student has been suspended prior to the date of conviction by the state-supported institution of higher education for the same riot activity, the twelve month suspension shall run from the start of the suspension imposed by the institution.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a state-supported institution of higher education from implementing its own policies and procedures or disciplinary actions, in addition to the suspension in subsection (2) of this section, regarding students involved in riots.

The court in each judicial district shall report to the Colorado commission on higher education the name of any person who is convicted in the judicial district of a riot offense.

The Colorado commission on higher education shall make the conviction reports received pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) available to all state-supported institutions of higher education with the notification that the persons included in the conviction reports are subject to the provisions of this section and that the state-supported institution of higher education in which any of such persons are enrolled shall consider appropriate disciplinary action against the student.

Each state-supported institution of higher education shall notify its students and prospective students of the requirements of this section. The governing board of each state-supported institution of higher education shall prescribe the manner in which this information shall be disseminated.

For purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Convicted" means having received a verdict of guilty, pleaded guilty or nolo contendere, or having received a deferred judgment and sentence.

"Riot offense" means:

Inciting riot, as described in section

18-9-102

, C.R.S.;

Arming rioters, as described in section

18-9-103

, C.R.S.;

Engaging in a riot, as described in section

18-9-104

, C.R.S.

"State-supported institution of higher education" means any postsecondary institution that is governed by:

The board of governors of the Colorado state university system;

The board of regents of the university of Colorado;

The board of trustees of the Colorado school of mines;

The board of trustees for the university of northern Colorado;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 790, § 10, effective July 1, 2003.)

The state board of community colleges and occupational education;

The board of any local college district in Colorado;

The board of trustees for Adams state university;

The board of trustees for Colorado Mesa university;

The board of trustees for Western Colorado university;

The board of trustees for Fort Lewis college; or

The board of trustees for Metropolitan state university of Denver.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 1134, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 2003:

(6)(c)(I), (6)(c)(VI), and (6)(c)(VII) amended and (6)(c)(XI) and (6)(c)(XII) added, p. 1994, § 38, effective May 22; (6)(c) amended, p. 790, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(6)(c)(IX) amended, (SB 11-265), ch. 292, p. 1367, § 22, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(6)(c)(VIII) amended, (HB 12-1080), ch. 189, p. 759, § 17, effective May 19; (6)(c)(XII) amended, (SB 12-148), ch. 125, p. 427, § 13, effective July 1;(6)(c)(X) amended, (HB 12-1331), ch. 254, p. 1271, § 16, effective August 1.

L. 2019:

(6)(c)(X) amended, (HB 19-1178), ch. 400, p. 3546, § 15, effective July 1.

23-5-125. Campus sex offender information.

Each institution of postsecondary education in the state shall provide a statement to its campus community identifying the name and location at which members of the community may obtain the law enforcement agency information collected pursuant to section 16-22-110 (3.5), C.R.S., concerning registered sex offenders.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 1201, § 2, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1192, § 39, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as 23-5-124 in House Bill 02-1114, but was renumbered on revision for ease of location.

23-5-126. Governing boards - anti-terrorism measures.

The Colorado commission on higher education in consultation with each governing board shall adopt such guidelines and policies, no later than December 1, 2002, as may be necessary to provide all lawful information requested by the federal bureau of investigation, the central intelligence agency, the department of homeland security, or any other federal agency in connection with an anti-terrorism investigation. The guidelines and policies shall include requiring each state-supported institution of higher education to verify and report the status of all foreign students, as required by the department of homeland security, or any other federal agency.

The administrators at each state-supported institution of higher education shall cooperate with and provide, in an immediate manner, all lawful information requested by the federal bureau of investigation, the central intelligence agency, the department of homeland security, or any other federal agency in connection with an anti-terrorism investigation.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 999, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1162, § 50, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as 23-5-124 in Senate Bill 02-113, but was renumbered on revision for ease of location.